New York, session 2025-2026, S7549.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1151 of the vehicle and traffic law, is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision (d) to read as follows: 3 (d) Wherever a multi-use trail crosses a roadway, a vehicle shall 4 yield the right of way to any user of such multi-use trail crossing such 5 roadway within a crosswalk on such roadway upon which such vehicle is 6 traveling. Any user of a multi-use trail, including a bicyclist, shall 7 be subject to the same limitations placed on pedestrians pursuant to 8 this section for the purposes of crossing a roadway in a crosswalk that 9 is contiguous to such multi-use trail. For the purposes of this subdivi- 10 sion, the term "multi-use trail" shall mean a trail established pursuant 11 to section twenty-two of the highway law by the department of transpor- 12 tation or established by the office of parks, recreation and historic 13 preservation, the department of environmental conservation, the New York 14 State Canal Corporation, the Hudson River Valley Greenway, or any other 15 state agency or an affiliate or subsidiary of a state agency, or a coun- 16 ty, city, town, village, or private entity for recreation and transpor- 17 tation use by pedestrians, bicyclists, and/or others utilizing non-mo- 18 torized transport. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09139-01-5